Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB797.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1901(c) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1901. Exemption of persons, entities and vehicles from fees.* * *(c) Processing fee in lieu of registration fee.--No registration fee shall be charged for vehicles registered by any of the following but the department shall charge a fee of $10 to cover the costs of processing for issuing or renewing the registration:* * *(24) A person who is receiving disability benefits as a veteran based on injuries or other disability received or contracted while performing duty in active service of the 123456789101112131415161718 armed forces of the United States or the Commonwealth whose total annual income does not exceed $19,200. Unless the veteran specified under this paragraph is physically or mentally incapable of driving the vehicle, the veteran shall be the principal driver of the vehicle but may from time to time authorize another person to drive the vehicle in his or her stead.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0797PN0856 - 2 - 123456789